Vermont statutes. Title 14 Decedents’ Estates and Fiduciary Relations
Subchapter 8. Void or Voidable Appointment

§ 2961.
Previous acts confirmed and compensation allowed, on being lawfully appointed.

If a person who has acted as guardian under an appointment void or voidable by reason of the incapacity of the judge or register of probate to make such appointment, shall afterwards be lawfully appointed guardian of the ward named in such void or voidable appointment, the Probate Division of the Superior Court making such lawful appointment may ratify and confirm the acts, approve and allow the accounts, and allow full compensation for the services of such person while acting under such previous appointment, if it appears that such person has acted in good faith and executed the supposed trust as required by law.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011.

§ 2962.
Good faith.

A person who has acted in good faith as guardian under an appointment void or voidable may render an account as guardian to the court in which the proceeding is pending.
If it appears that the person accepted and acted under appointment in good faith and has executed the supposed trust as required by law, the court shall confirm the acts, allow the accounts, and allow full compensation for the services of the person, and may allow and confirm all accounts of the person, which have been previously examined and allowed if the accounts are found correct and just.

HISTORY:

Amended

1985, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 148.

§ 2963.
Conveyances valid.

When the acts of a guardian under a void or voidable appointment are confirmed, as provided in sections 2961 and 2962 of this title, all sales of the real estate of the supposed ward previously made under a license issued by the Probate Division of the Superior Court shall be valid and of full force from the date of sale.

HISTORY:

Amended

1985, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 149;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011.

§ 2964.
Bond.

A bond given to a Probate Division of the Superior Court by a guardian under a void or voidable appointment shall be valid. If he or she is appointed guardian, as provided in section 2961 of this title, a new bond need not be required, if, in the opinion of the Probate Division of the Superior Court, the first bond given is sufficient.

HISTORY:

Amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011.